nl: Pookknop vorm: Bal; Kegel; Cilinder; Ovaal; Pistoolgreep; Schedel/novelty; T-greep; Druppel; Verzwaarde billet-stijl; Overig
zh-TW: 排檔頭形狀: 球形; 圓錐形; 圓柱形; 橢圓形; 手槍握把; 骷髏/新奇; T 型手柄; 水滴形; 加重鋼胚式; 其他
fr: Forme du pommeau de levier de vitesses: Boule; Cône; Cylindre; Ovale; Poignée pistolet; Crâne/fantaisie; Poignée en T; Larme; Style billette lestée; Autre
en: Shift knob shape: Ball; Cone; Cylinder; Oval; Pistol grip; Skull/novelty; T-handle; Teardrop; Weighted billet style; Other
pt-BR: Manopla de câmbio formato: Bola; Cone; Cilindro; Oval; Punho de pistola; Caveira/novidade; Manopla em T; Gota; Usinado com peso; Outro
ru: Форма рукоятки переключения передач: Шар; Конус; Цилиндр; Овал; Пистолетная рукоятка; Череп/оригинальная форма; T-образная рукоятка; Капля; Утяжеленная металлическая; Другое
zh-CN: 换挡旋钮形状: 球形; 锥形; 圆柱形; 椭圆形; 手枪式握把; 骷髅/新奇图案; T 型手柄; 泪珠形; 加重方坯式; 其他
pl: Kształt gałki zmiany biegów: Kula; Stożek; Cylinder; Owal; Uchwyt pistoletowy; Czaszka/wymyślny; Uchwyt T (T-handle); Łezka; Masywny z bloku (billet); Inne
de: Form des Schaltknaufs: Kugel; Kegel; Zylinder; Oval; Pistolengriff; Totenkopf/Novität; T-Griff; Tropfenform; Beschwerter Billet-Stil; Sonstige
sl-SI: Oblika glave prestavne ročice: Krogla; Stožec; Valj; Oval; Pištolski ročaj; Lobanja/posebna oblika; T-ročaj; Solza; Obtežen slog (billet); Drugo
sv: Växelknoppens form: Kula; Kon; Cylinder; Oval; Pistolgrepp; Dödskalle/novelty; T-handtag; Droppformad; Viktad billet-stil; Annat
tr: Vites topuzu şekli: Top; Koni; Silindir; Oval; Kabza; Kafatası/yenilikçi; T kol; Gözyaşı damlası; Ağırlıklı kütük stili; Diğer
cs: Tvar řadicí páky: Koule; Kužel; Válec; Ovál; Pistolová rukojeť; Lebka / netradiční tvar; T-rukojeť; Kapka; Těžký kovový (billet); Jiné
vi: Hình dạng cần số: Bóng; Hình nón; Hình trụ; Hình bầu dục; Báng súng; Đầu lâu/hình độc lạ; Tay cầm chữ T; Hình giọt nước; Khối gia công có trọng lượng; Khác
it: Forma del pomello del cambio: Sfera; Cono; Cilindro; Ovale; Impugnatura a pistola; Teschio/novità; Impugnatura a T; A goccia; Stile billet zavorrato; Altro
hr-HR: Shapesručice mjenjača: Kugla; Stožac; Cilindar; Ovalno; Drška pištolja; Lubanja/ukrasno; T-ručica; Suza; Otežani tokareni stil; Drugo
nb: Girspakeform: Kule; Kjegle; Sylinder; Oval; Pistolgrep; Hodeskalle/spesial; T-håndtak; Dråpe; Vektet billet-stil; Annet
bg-BG: Форма на топката (главата) на скоростния лост: Топка; Конус; Цилиндър; Овал; Пистолетен захват; Череп/нестандартна форма; T-образна дръжка; Капка; Утежнена масивна; Друго
th: รูปทรงของหัวเกียร์: ทรงกลม; ทรงกรวย; ทรงกระบอก; วงรี; ทรงด้ามปืน; ทรงหัวกะโหลก/แปลกใหม่; ด้ามจับรูปตัว T; ทรงหยดน้ำ; ทรงบิลเล็ตแบบถ่วงน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Pavarų rankenėlės forma: Rutulio; Kūgio; Cilindro; Ovalo; Pistoleto rankenos; Kaukolės / suvenyrinė; T formos rankena; Lašo formos; Sunkinto metalo ruošinio; Kita
da: Form på gearknop: Kugle; Kegle; Cylinder; Oval; Pistolgreb; Kranie/specialdesign; T-håndtag; Dråbe; Vægtet billet-stil; Andet
ko: 기어 변속 노브 모양: 볼; 콘; 실린더; 타원형; 피스톨 그립; 해골/노벨티; T-핸들; 티어드롭; 웨이티드 빌릿 스타일; 기타
pt-PT: Forma do botão de mudanças: Bola; Cone; Cilindro; Oval; Pega tipo pistola; Caveira/novidade; Pega em T; Lágrima; Estilo bloco metálico com peso; Outro
sk-SK: Tvar radiacej páky: Guľa; Kužeľ; Valec; Ovál; Pištoľová rukoväť; Lebka/Zábavný tvar; T-rukoväť; Kvapka; Ťažký masívny kov; Iné
ja: シフトノブ形状: ボール; コーン; シリンダー; オーバル; ピストルグリップ; スカル/ノベルティ; Tハンドル; ティアドロップ; ウェイテッドビレットスタイル; その他
ro-RO: Formă a mânerului schimbătorului: Sferă; Con; Cilindru; Oval; Mâner de pistol; Craniu/decorativ; Mâner în T; Picătură; Billet îngreunat; Altele
el: Σχήμα πόμολου ταχυτήτων: Μπάλα; Κώνος; Κύλινδρος; Οβάλ; Λαβή πιστολιού; Κρανίο/πρωτότυπο; Λαβή τύπου Τ; Σταγόνα; Στιλ βαρύ μασίφ; Άλλο
es: Forma de la palanca de cambios: Bola; Cono; Cilindro; Óvalo; Empuñadura de pistola; Calavera/novedad; Mango en T; Lágrima; Palanquilla con peso; Otro
hu: Váltógomb alakja: Golyó; Kúp; Henger; Ovális; Pisztolymarkolat; Koponya / Különleges; T-fogantyú; Csepp; Súlyozott fémtömb stílusú; Egyéb
fi: Vaihdekepin nupin muoto: Pallo; Kartio; Sylinteri; Ovaali; Pistoolikahva; Pääkallo/erikoisuus; T-kahva; Pisara; Painotettu työstetty; Muu